District of Columbia statutes.
4-210.17

Confidentiality.

If the claimant waives in writing his or her privilege of confidentiality as to the hearing, he or she shall be permitted by the Mayor to invite to the hearing any reasonable number of members of the public as he deems appropriate; provided, that the hearing officer may, in his discretion, considering the space and seating capacity of the room in which the hearing is to be held, impose limitations on the number of persons allowed to attend the same.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1017, 29 DCR 1060

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-210.17.